Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1706.   Dismissal of an appeal not filed in compliance with requirements.

A procurement appeals panel may dismiss an appeal that is assigned to the procurement appeals panel if the appeal is not filed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

